Hawaii, session 2026, HB449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that technology adoption for small businesses in Hawaii is vital for these businesses to remain competitive in an increasingly digital marketplace.  Leveraging technology can help small businesses optimize operations, reduce costs, and expand their reach beyond the islands.  Digital tools such as booking systems, online marketing platforms, and data analytics can help reduce costs, expand market reach, and help tourism-based businesses attract and retain customers while enhancing the overall visitor experience. Furthermore, technology mitigates the risks of geographic isolation by enabling remote work, virtual services, and e-commerce opportunities. Supporting small businesses with technology adoption ensures their ability to innovate and adapt, bolstering their resilience and contributing to the long-term economic sustainability of Hawaii's communities.  At the same time, non-action would exacerbate Hawaii's economic vulnerabilities. The legislature further finds that the Hawaii technology development corporation was established to foster innovation and economic diversification by supporting the growth and development of Hawaii's technology sector.  With decades of experience implementing technology-driven initiatives, the Hawaii technology development corporation has successfully facilitated numerous projects funded by the State and ensured effective use of state resources, with a proven track record of fostering innovation and economic diversification through state-funded initiatives, demonstrating expertise in administering grants, supporting startups, and promoting public-private partnerships, which has empowered local businesses and driven economic progress.  The Hawaii technology development corporation's expertise spans a wide range of industries, enabling the effective implementation of cutting-edge technologies tailored to Hawaii's unique challenges and opportunities.  Its commitment to leveraging state funding for impactful technology projects underscores its role as a critical catalyst for innovation and competitiveness in Hawaii's economy. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to promote economic development by: (1)  Establishing a program that provides technology enablement for small businesses related to the tourism industry in the State; and (2)  Appropriating funds for assisting in the development and promotion of Hawaii-manufactured products through the INNOVATE Hawaii program. SECTION 2.  (a) The Hawaii technology development corporation shall establish a program for technology enablement for small businesses related to the tourism industry in the State. (b)  The Hawaii technology development corporation shall submit a report on the status of the program, including the number of small businesses participating in the program, and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (c) For the purposes of this section, "technology enablement" means the strategic use of technology to improve a business's operations, increase efficiency, and drive innovation. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for assisting in the development and promotion of Hawaii-manufactured products through the INNOVATE Hawaii program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________